Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.135

Updating information.

(1) When a person who has previously registered to vote in another state applies for voter registration in Washington, the person shall provide on the registration form all information needed to cancel any previous registration. Notification must be made to the state elections office of the applicant's previous state of registration.

(2) A county auditor receiving official information that a voter has registered to vote in another state shall immediately cancel that voter's registration on the official state voter registration list.

[ 2009 c 369 s 14; 2004 c 267 s 111; 2003 c 111 s 211; 2001 c 41 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 184 s 1; 1973 c 153 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.07.092.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 184: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 184 s 5.]